Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5713.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that the celebration of Patriots' Day originated in Massachusetts in 1894 with governor Frederic T. Greenhalge. Maine began observing Patriots' Day as a state holiday in 1907, and today, Patriots' Day is recognized in Connecticut, Florida, North Dakota, and Wisconsin. The holiday is meant to commemorate the battles of Lexington and Concord (April 19, 1775), celebrating the beginning of the American fight for independence. Traditions include Revolutionary War reenactments, ceremonies honoring the colonial militia, and the Boston Marathon. While not one of the original 13 colonies, the land including present-day Michigan housed several British settlements that played significant roles as strategic outposts during the war. Three well-recognized locations include Forts Detroit, Mackinac, and St. Joseph. The Battle of Fort St. Joseph took place near the midpoint of the war on February 12, 1781. Fort Detroit's Lieutenant Governor Henry Hamilton became an infamous commander during the war for his practice of encouraging Native American warriors to raid colonial settlements. Several years later, Revolutionary War soldier Colonel John Francis Hamtramck would become the commandant of Fort Detroit. In recognition of the above, the legislature declares that April 19 of each year shall be known as "Patriots' Day".